Wisconsin, session 2025, AB220.
do enact as follows:AB220,11Section 1. 15.04 (1) (g) of the statutes is amended to read:AB220,3,11215.04 (1) (g) Discrimination review. In order to determine whether there is 3any arbitrary discrimination on the basis of race, religion, national origin, sex, 4marital status or, gender identity, as defined in s. 111.32 (7j), gender expression, as 5defined in s. 111.32 (7h), or sexual orientation, as defined in s. 111.32 (13m), 6examine and assess the statutes under which the head has powers or regulatory 7responsibilities, the procedures by which those statutes are administered, and the 8rules promulgated under those statutes. If the department or agency head finds 9any such discrimination, he or she the agency head shall take remedial action, 10including making recommendations to the appropriate executive, legislative, or 11administrative authority.AB220,212Section 2. 16.765 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB220,4,71316.765 (1) Contracting agencies, the University of Wisconsin Hospitals and 14Clinics Authority, the Fox River Navigational System Authority, the Wisconsin 15Aerospace Authority, the Lower Fox River Remediation Authority, the Wisconsin 16Economic Development Corporation, and the Bradley Center Sports and 17Entertainment Corporation shall include in all contracts executed by them a 1provision obligating the contractor not to discriminate against any employee or 2applicant for employment because of age, race, religion, color, handicap disability, 3sex, physical condition, developmental disability, as defined in s. 51.01 (5), sexual 4orientation, as defined in s. 111.32 (13m), gender identity, as defined in s. 111.32 5(7j), gender expression, as defined in s. 111.32 (7h), or national origin and, except 6with respect to sexual orientation, gender identity, or gender expression, obligating 7the contractor to take affirmative action to ensure equal employment opportunities.AB220,38Section 3. 16.765 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:AB220,5,5916.765 (2) Contracting agencies, the University of Wisconsin Hospitals and 10Clinics Authority, the Fox River Navigational System Authority, the Wisconsin 11Aerospace Authority, the Lower Fox River Remediation Authority, the Wisconsin 12Economic Development Corporation, and the Bradley Center Sports and 13Entertainment Corporation shall include the following provision in every contract 14executed by them: “In connection with the performance of work under this 15contract, the contractor agrees not to discriminate against any employee or 16applicant for employment because of age, race, religion, color, handicap disability, 17sex, physical condition, developmental disability, as defined in s. 51.01 (5), sexual 18orientation, as defined in s. 111.32 (13m), gender identity, as defined in s. 111.32 19(7j), gender expression, as defined in s. 111.32 (7h), or national origin. This 20provision shall include, but not be limited to, the following: employment, upgrading, 21demotion or transfer; recruitment or recruitment advertising; layoff or termination; 22rates of pay or other forms of compensation; and selection for training, including 23apprenticeship. Except with respect to sexual orientation, gender identity, or 1gender expression, the contractor further agrees to take affirmative action to 2ensure equal employment opportunities. The contractor agrees to post in 3conspicuous places, available for employees and applicants for employment, notices 4to be provided by the contracting officer setting forth the provisions of the 5nondiscrimination clause”. clause.”AB220,46Section 4. 36.09 (1) (e) of the statutes is amended to read:AB220,5,20736.09 (1) (e) Subject to par. (em), the board shall appoint a president of the 8system; a chancellor for each institution; a dean for each college campus; the state 9geologist; the director of the laboratory of hygiene; the director of the psychiatric 10institute; the state cartographer; and the requisite number of officers, other than 11the vice presidents, associate vice presidents, and assistant vice presidents of the 12system; faculty; academic staff; and other employees and fix the salaries, subject to 13the limitations under par. (j) and s. 230.12 (3) (e), the duties and the term of office 14for each. The board shall fix the salaries, subject to the limitations under par. (j) 15and s. 230.12 (3) (e), and the duties for each chancellor, vice president, associate 16vice president, and assistant vice president of the system. No sectarian or partisan 17tests or any tests based upon race, religion, national origin, or sex, gender identity, 18as defined in s. 111.32 (7j), gender expression, as defined in s. 111.32 (7h), or sexual 19orientation, as defined in s. 111.32 (13m), shall ever be allowed or exercised in the 20appointment of the employees of the system.AB220,521Section 5. 36.11 (3) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB220,6,72236.11 (3) (a) Subject to sub. (3m), the board shall establish the policies for 23admission within the system and within these policies each institution shall 1establish specific requirements for admission to its courses of instruction. No 2sectarian or partisan tests test or any tests test based upon race, color, creed, 3religion, sex, national origin of U.S. citizens or sex, disability, ancestry, age, sexual 4orientation, as defined in s. 111.32 (13m), gender identity, as defined in s. 111.32 5(7j), gender expression, as defined in s. 111.32 (7h), pregnancy, marital status, or 6parental status shall ever be allowed in the admission of students thereto a student 7to any service, course, program, or facility of the system or any of its institutions.AB220,68Section 6. 36.12 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB220,6,15936.12 (1) No student may be denied admission to, participation in, or the 10benefits of, or be discriminated against in, any service, program, course, or facility 11of the system or its institutions because of the student’s race, color, creed, religion, 12sex, national origin, disability, ancestry, age, sexual orientation, as defined in s. 13111.32 (13m), gender identity, as defined in s. 111.32 (7j), gender expression, as 14defined in s. 111.32 (7h), pregnancy, marital status, or parental status of the 15student or of the student’s parent.AB220,716Section 7. 36.29 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB220,7,121736.29 (1) All gifts, grants, and bequests for the benefit or advantage of the 18system or any of its institutions, departments, or facilities or to provide any means 19of instruction, illustration, or knowledge in connection therewith, whether made to 20trustees or otherwise, shall be valid notwithstanding any other provision of this 21chapter except as otherwise provided in this subsection and shall be executed and 22enforced according to the provisions of the instrument making the same, including 23all provisions and directions in any such instrument for accumulation of the income 1of any fund or rents and profits of any real estate without being subject to the 2limitations and restrictions provided by law in other cases; but no such income 3accumulation shall be allowed to produce a fund more than 20 times as great as 4that originally given. No investment of the funds of such gifts, grants, or bequests 5shall knowingly be made in any company, corporation, subsidiary, or affiliate that 6practices or condones through its actions discrimination on the basis of race, 7religion, color, creed, or sex, gender identity, as defined in s. 111.32 (7j), gender 8expression, as defined in s. 111.32 (7h), or sexual orientation, as defined in s. 111.32 9(13m). Except as otherwise provided in this section, the board may invest not to 10exceed 85 percent of trust funds held and administered by the board in common 11stocks. This subsection does not apply to a gift, grant, or bequest that the board 12declines to accept or that the board is not authorized to accept under this section.AB220,813Section 8. 38.04 (13) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB220,7,191438.04 (13) (b) No person may, on the ground of sex, gender identity, as defined 15in s. 111.32 (7j), gender expression, as defined in s. 111.32 (7h), sexual orientation, 16as defined in s. 111.32 (13m), age, race, color, religion, or national origin, be 17excluded from participating in, be denied the benefits of, or be subjected to 18discrimination under any program or activity funded in whole or in part with funds 19made available under this subsection.AB220,920Section 9. 38.23 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB220,8,42138.23 (1) No student may be denied admission to, participation in, or the 22benefits of, or be discriminated against in, any service, program, course, or facility 23of the board or any district because of the student’s race, color, creed, religion, sex, 1national origin, disability, ancestry, age, sexual orientation, as defined in s. 111.32 2(13m), gender identity, as defined in s. 111.32 (7j), gender expression, as defined in 3s. 111.32 (7h), pregnancy, marital status, or parental status of the student or of the 4student’s parent.AB220,105Section 10. 38.23 (4) of the statutes is amended to read:AB220,8,9638.23 (4) Nothing in this section or s. 36.12 prevents institutions from 7segregating students in dormitories based on sex, except that no student may be 8denied equal access to the dormitory most consistent with the student’s gender 9identity, as defined in s. 111.32 (7j).AB220,1110Section 11. 47.02 (3m) (f) of the statutes is amended to read:AB220,8,181147.02 (3m) (f) Assure that eligibility for vocational rehabilitation services 12under this chapter is determined without regard to the sex, gender identity, as 13defined in s. 111.32 (7j), gender expression, as defined in s. 111.32 (7h), sexual 14orientation, as defined in s. 111.32 (13m), race, age, creed, color, or national origin 15of the individual applying for services, that no class of individuals is found ineligible 16solely on the basis of type of disability, and that no age limitations for eligibility 17exist which that, by themselves, would result in ineligibility for vocational 18rehabilitation services.AB220,1219Section 12. 48.82 (1) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB220,8,212048.82 (1) (a) A husband and wife Two adults married to each other jointly, or 21either the husband or wife spouse if the other spouse is a parent of the minor.AB220,1322Section 13. 48.82 (6) of the statutes is amended to read:AB220,9,32348.82 (6) No otherwise qualified person may be denied the benefits of this 1subchapter because of his or her the person’s race, color, ancestry or, national 2origin, sex, gender identity, as defined in s. 111.32 (7j), gender expression, as 3defined in s. 111.32 (7h), or sexual orientation, as defined in s. 111.32 (13m).AB220,144Section 14. 51.90 of the statutes is amended to read:AB220,9,9551.90 Antidiscrimination. No employee, prospective employee, patient, or 6resident of an approved treatment facility, or consumer of services provided under 7this chapter, may be discriminated against because of age, race, creed, color, sex or 8handicap, disability, gender identity, as defined in s. 111.32 (7j), gender expression, 9as defined in s. 111.32 (7h), or sexual orientation, as defined in s. 111.32 (13m).AB220,1510Section 15. 66.0125 (3) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB220,9,221166.0125 (3) (a) The purpose of the commission is to study, analyze, and 12recommend solutions for the major social, economic, and cultural problems that 13affect people residing or working within the local governmental unit, including 14problems of the family, youth, education, the aging, juvenile delinquency, health 15and zoning standards, discrimination in employment and public accommodations 16and facilities on the basis of sex, class, race, religion, gender identity, as defined in 17s. 111.32 (7j), gender expression, as defined in s. 111.32 (7h), sexual orientation, as 18defined in s. 111.32 (13m), or ethnic or minority status and discrimination in 19housing on the basis of sex, class, race, religion, sexual orientation, as defined in s. 20111.32 (13m), gender identity, as defined in s. 111.32 (7j), gender expression, as 21defined in s. 111.32 (7h), ethnic or minority status, or status as a victim of domestic 22abuse, sexual assault, or stalking.AB220,1623Section 16. 66.0125 (3) (c) 1. b. of the statutes is amended to read:AB220,10,8166.0125 (3) (c) 1. b. To ensure to all residents of a local governmental unit, 2regardless of sex, race, sexual orientation, as defined in s. 111.32 (13m), gender 3identity, as defined in s. 111.32 (7j), gender expression, as defined in s. 111.32 (7h), 4or color, the right to enjoy equal employment opportunities and to ensure to those 5residents, regardless of sex, race, sexual orientation, as defined in s. 111.32 (13m), 6gender identity, as defined in s. 111.32 (7j), gender expression, as defined in s. 7111.32 (7h), color, or status as a victim of domestic abuse, sexual assault, or 8stalking, the right to possess equal housing opportunities. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab220 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab220 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB220 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB220 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB220: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting